New York, session 2025-2026, S837.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of NYCRR sections 14-2.1 and 2 14-2.2, or any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a lemonade 3 stand operated by a person under the age of 16 years shall not be 4 considered to be a temporary food establishment for the purposes of 5 title 10 NYCRR chapter 14. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. Effective immediately, 7 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 8 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 9 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02770-01-5